Utah statutes.
32B-11-605.   Renewal requirements for local industry representative license.

(1)  A local industry representative license expires on December 31 of each year.

(2)  To renew a local industry representative license, a person shall submit to the department by no later than November 30 of the year the license expires:

(a)  a completed renewal application in a form prescribed by the department;

(b)  a renewal fee of $125; and

(c)  an affidavit stating the name and address of any manufacturer, supplier, or importer the local industry representative licensee represents at the time of submitting the renewal application.

(3)  Failure to meet the renewal requirements results in an automatic forfeiture of the local industry representative license effective on the date the existing local industry representative license expires.



Amended by Chapter 334, 2011 General Session

